District of Columbia statutes.
6-301.02

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 791, ch. 736, § 3
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 1102, Pub. L. 85-854, § 1(1-3)
Aug. 17, 1982, D.C. Law 4-140, § 2(a), 29 DCR 2862
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-188, § 3(1), 49 DCR 6516
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 232(b), 50 DCR 5668
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 303(a), 56 DCR 1117
1981 Ed., § 5-802.
1973 Ed., § 5-702.
Temporary Repeal of Section For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 9(a)(2) of the Redevelopment Land Agency-RLA Revitalization Corporation Transfer Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-66, Feb. 27, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2276).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 9(a)(1) of the Redevelopment Land Agency-RLA Revitalization Corporation Transfer Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-66, Feb. 27, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2276).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(a)(1), (b) of Redevelopment Land Agency-RLA Revitalization Corporate Transfer Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-259, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1424).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 232(b) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 232(b) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
Section 33(b)(1) of D.C. Law 12-144 provided that § 31(a) shall take effect on the latter of: (A) September 11, 1998; or (B) the Dates determined by the Board, but not later than one year after the initial meeting of the Board.
“National Capital Planning Commission” was substituted for “National Capital Park and Planning Commission” in paragraph (10) of this section in view of the Act of June 6, 1924, ch. 270, § 9, as added by the Act of July 19, 1952, 66 Stat. 790, ch. 949, § 1, which transferred the functions, powers, and duties of the National Capital Park and Planning Commission to the National Capital Planning Commission.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.